dev/mt_brokenplurals/appendix1.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="ġ/nien__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>nien</l><r>nien<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>onna</l><r>nien<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="far/xa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>xa</l><r>xa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ax</l><r>xa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/aħrax__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aħrax</l><r>aħrax<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħorox</l><r>aħrax<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/emx__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>emx</l><r>emx<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>mux</l><r>emx<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/arid__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arid</l><r>arid<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>orda</l><r>arid<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/andul__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>andul</l><r>andul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nadel</l><r>andul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>niedel</l><r>andul<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċe/nċiela__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>nċiela</l><r>nċiela<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ċniel</l><r>nċiela<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/edaq__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>edaq</l><r>edaq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>idqa</l><r>edaq<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/orm__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>orm</l><r>orm<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>rum</l><r>orm<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/amħ__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>amħ</l><r>amħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>muħ</l><r>amħ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/urpett__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>urpett</l><r>urpett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riepet</l><r>urpett<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="qat/ta__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ta</l><r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>et</l><r>ta<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ta/rtana__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>rtana</l><r>rtana<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tran</l><r>rtana<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ieħeb__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ieħeb</l><r>ieħeb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħab</l><r>ieħeb<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ena__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ena</l><r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nin</l><r>ena<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/ansab__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ansab</l><r>ansab<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>nasab</l><r>ansab<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sk/una__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>una</l><r>una<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ejjen</l><r>una<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/arbun__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>arbun</l><r>arbun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>raban</l><r>arbun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>raben</l><r>arbun<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="g/orboġ__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>orboġ</l><r>orboġ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>riebeġ</l><r>orboġ<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="f/qir__adj_GD">
      <e><p><l>qir</l><r>qir<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>qar</l><r>qir<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>oqra</l><r>qir<s n="adj"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="tor/k__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>k</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ok</l><r>k<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ħ/oss__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>oss</l><r>oss<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sejjes</l><r>oss<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/usrana__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>usrana</l><r>usrana<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>saren</l><r>usrana<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="b/uzzell__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>uzzell</l><r>uzzell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ziezel</l><r>uzzell<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="q/asrija__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>asrija</l><r>asrija<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>sari</l><r>asrija<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ur__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ur</l><r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>war</l><r>ur<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="xil/pa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>pa</l><r>pa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ep</l><r>pa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/usmar__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>usmar</l><r>usmar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>siemer</l><r>usmar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="d/awl__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>awl</l><r>awl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wal</l><r>awl<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="bor/ma__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ma</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>om</l><r>ma<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fid/da__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>da</l><r>da<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ed</l><r>da<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="fos/sa__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>sa</l><r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>os</l><r>sa<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="vir/ga__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ga</l><r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eg</l><r>ga<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="maz/za__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>za</l><r>za<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ez</l><r>za<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="x/iber__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>iber</l><r>iber<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ibra</l><r>iber<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="s/ala__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>ala</l><r>ala<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>wali</l><r>ala<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ċ/off__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>off</l><r>off<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>fuf</l><r>off<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="m/aħġar__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>aħġar</l><r>aħġar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ħaġar</l><r>aħġar<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ġ/idra__n_GD">
      <e><p><l>idra</l><r>idra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>dur</l><r>idra<s n="n"/><s n="GD"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="pjazza"><i>pjaz</i><par n="maz/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sena"><i>s</i><par n="s/ena__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġidra"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/idra__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="lanza"><i>lan</i><par n="maz/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="maħġar"><i>m</i><par n="m/aħġar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tartana"><i>ta</i><par n="ta/rtana__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kurpett"><i>k</i><par n="k/urpett__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="morsa"><i>mor</i><par n="fos/sa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xiber"><i>x</i><par n="x/iber__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="lenza"><i>len</i><par n="maz/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sur"><i>s</i><par n="s/ur__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sieħeb"><i>s</i><par n="s/ieħeb__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċanga"><i>ċan</i><par n="vir/ga__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sorm"><i>s</i><par n="s/orm__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mazza"><i>maz</i><par n="maz/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="musmar"><i>m</i><par n="m/usmar__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pinta"><i>pin</i><par n="qat/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċenċiela"><i>ċe</i><par n="ċe/nċiela__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="barbun"><i>b</i><par n="b/arbun__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="nikta"><i>nik</i><par n="qat/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="razza"><i>raz</i><par n="maz/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="forma"><i>for</i><par n="bor/ma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tork"><i>tor</i><par n="tor/k__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċinga"><i>ċin</i><par n="vir/ga__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fidda"><i>fid</i><par n="fid/da__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pizza"><i>piz</i><par n="maz/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xilpa"><i>xil</i><par n="xil/pa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="dawl"><i>d</i><par n="d/awl__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tinda"><i>tin</i><par n="fid/da__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mħadda"><i>mħad</i><par n="fid/da__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="aħrax"><i></i><par n="/aħrax__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xedaq"><i>x</i><par n="x/edaq__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="buzzell"><i>b</i><par n="b/uzzell__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ħoss"><i>ħ</i><par n="ħ/oss__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="marid"><i>m</i><par n="m/arid__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="somma"><i>som</i><par n="bor/ma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="sala"><i>s</i><par n="s/ala__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="skuna"><i>sk</i><par n="sk/una__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fossa"><i>fos</i><par n="fos/sa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mansab"><i>m</i><par n="m/ansab__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="virga"><i>vir</i><par n="vir/ga__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="grossa"><i>gros</i><par n="fos/sa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċinta"><i>ċin</i><par n="qat/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="borma"><i>bor</i><par n="bor/ma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gomma"><i>gom</i><par n="bor/ma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mezza"><i>mez</i><par n="maz/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="gorboġ"><i>g</i><par n="g/orboġ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="xemx"><i>x</i><par n="x/emx__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="fqir"><i>f</i><par n="f/qir__adj_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="pezza"><i>pez</i><par n="maz/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="kappa"><i>kap</i><par n="xil/pa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="farxa"><i>far</i><par n="far/xa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ġnien"><i>ġ</i><par n="ġ/nien__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="tazza"><i>taz</i><par n="maz/za__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="musrana"><i>m</i><par n="m/usrana__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qasrija"><i>q</i><par n="q/asrija__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="setta"><i>set</i><par n="qat/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="mappa"><i>map</i><par n="xil/pa__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qamħ"><i>q</i><par n="q/amħ__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="ċoff"><i>ċ</i><par n="ċ/off__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="landa"><i>lan</i><par n="fid/da__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="loqma"><i>loq</i><par n="bor/ma__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qandul"><i>q</i><par n="q/andul__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="qatta"><i>qat</i><par n="qat/ta__n_GD"/></e>
    <e lm="stanga"><i>stan</i><par n="vir/ga__n_GD"/></e>
